Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1900.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVII-B.1TEACHER EDUCATOR TAX CREDIT Section 1701-B.1. Scope of article.This article relates to teacher EDUCATOR tax credits. Section 1702-B.1. Definitions.<--<--<--1234567891011121314151617181920 The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Certified teacher." An individual who, during any portion of the taxable year for which the tax credit is being sought, was certified as a teacher by the Commonwealth and was employed as a teacher in a public, nonpublic or charter school in this Commonwealth."Classroom supplies." The term includes books, materials, computers and related equipment, including related software and services, other equipment and supplementary materials for use in the classroom of a certified teacher AN ELIGIBLE EDUCATOR . "Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."ELIGIBLE EDUCATOR." AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS EMPLOYED AS A TEACHER, INSTRUCTOR, COUNSELOR, PRINCIPAL OR AIDE FOR STUDENTS IN KINDERGARTEN THROUGH GRADE 12 FOR AT LEAST THE MINIMUM NUMBER OF DAYS OR HOURS REQUIRED UNDER SECTION 133, 914.1-A(C), 1327(B), 1327.3 OR 1715-A(9) OF THE ACT OF MARCH 10, 1949 (P.L.30, NO.14), KNOWN AS THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949, TO PROVIDE AN ELEMENTARY OR SECONDARY EDUCATION IN A PUBLIC OR NONPUBLIC SCHOOL LOCATED IN THIS COMMONWEALTH."Tax credit." The teacher EDUCATOR tax credit established under this article."Taxpayer." An individual who is a certified teacher AN ELIGIBLE EDUCATOR and subject to tax under Article III. Section 1703-B.1. Tax credit for teachers EDUCATORS . (a) Eligibility.--A taxpayer who is a certified teacher and incurs expenses for the purchase of classroom supplies in a taxable year may apply for a tax credit.(b) Amount of credit.--The amount CREDIT.-- 20250HB1900PN2537 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) THE AMOUNT of the tax credit shall be equal to 100% of the amount that the taxpayer spent on unreimbursed classroom supplies during the taxable year, up to a maximum of $100.(2) FOR MARRIED TAXPAYERS FILING JOINTLY WHO ARE BOTH ELIGIBLE EDUCATORS, THE TAXPAYERS SHALL BE ELIGIBLE FOR A CREDIT EQUAL TO 100% OF THE AMOUNT THAT THE TAXPAYERS SPENT ON UNREIMBURSED CLASSROOM SUPPLIES DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR, UP TO A MAXIMUM OF $200.(c) Credit refundable.--If the amount of credit that the taxpayer is eligible to receive under this section exceeds the taxpayer's tax liability, the department shall pay the excess amount to the taxpayer.Section 1704-B.1. Eligibility.(a) Determination of eligibility.--In order to determine eligibility for the tax credit, the Department of Education shall annually provide to the department a list of all certified teachers during the taxable year.(b) Ineligibility.--(1) A taxpayer shall be ineligible for the tax credit unless the department verifies that the taxpayer's name appears on the list provided under subsection (a) , OR THAT THE TAXPAYER QUALIFIES AS AN ELIGIBLE EDUCATOR AS VERIFIED BY ANOTHER METHOD, for the taxable year in which the tax credit is being sought. THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUEST ADDITIONAL INFORMATION TO VERIFY ELIGIBILITY.(2) A taxpayer shall be ineligible for the tax credit if the taxpayer has claimed a deduction for unreimbursed business expenses related to classroom education under Article III for the taxable year in which the tax credit is 20250HB1900PN2537 - 3 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sought. This paragraph shall not apply if any part of the amount of unreimbursed business expenses claimed is unrelated to classroom supplies.Section 1705-B.1. Carryover, carryback, sale and assignment of tax credit.A taxpayer may not carry forward, carry back, sell or assign all or a portion of a tax credit granted to the taxpayer. Section 1706-B.1. Administration.The department may develop written guidelines for the implementation of this article.Section 2. This act shall apply to taxable years commencing after December 31, 2025.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1900PN2537 - 4 - 12345678910111213